Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-921
Department; power to accept gifts, grants, devises, and bequests; use.

The department may accept gifts, grants, devises, and bequests of real and personal property from public or private sources to carry out the purposes of the Protection from Domestic Abuse Act. The department may sell, lease, exchange, invest, or expend such gifts, grants, devises, and bequests or the proceeds, rents, profits, and income therefrom according to the terms and conditions thereof.

Laws 1978, LB 623, § 21;

Laws 1997, LB 829, § 6.